Texas statutes.
HEALTH AND SAFETY CODE

TITLE 2. HEALTH

SUBTITLE E. HEALTH CARE COUNCILS AND RESOURCE CENTERS

CHAPTER 109. STATEWIDE BEHAVIORAL HEALTH COORDINATING COUNCIL

Sec. 109.001. DEFINITION. In this chapter, "council" means the Statewide Behavioral Health Coordinating Council.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1167 (H.B. 3285), Sec. 5, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 109.002. STATEWIDE BEHAVIORAL HEALTH STRATEGIC PLAN. In preparing the statewide behavioral health strategic plan, the council shall incorporate, as a separate part of that plan, strategies regarding substance abuse issues that are developed by the council in cooperation with the Texas Medical Board and the Texas State Board of Pharmacy, including strategies for:

(1) addressing the challenges of existing prevention, intervention, and treatment programs;

(2) evaluating substance use disorder prevalence involving the abuse of opioids;

(3) identifying substance abuse treatment services availability and gaps; and

(4) collaborating with state agencies to expand substance abuse treatment services capacity in this state.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1167 (H.B. 3285), Sec. 5, eff. September 1, 2019.